src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-Indef
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ís    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #;

LEXICON nis-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@s     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@s     #;


LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.NITONE.MID@                     nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix-Forms;
@D.NITONE@                         nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix-Forms;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix-Forms
! Three forms of 2SG nii-IPFV after an inner prefix are attested and freely
! interchangeable: níí-, niínii-, and iínii- (e.g., tłítsiníínì ~
! tłítsiniíniinì ~ tłítsiíniinì "you (sg.) are tasty, taste good")
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis                      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí                      #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@niínii                   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@iínii                    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.NITONE.MID@ii         #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.NITONE@ii             #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2                     #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@R.NITONE.MID@ii         #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.NITONE@íí             #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@R.NITONE.MID@ii         #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@D.NITONE@íí             #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@R.LOWTONE.ON@                              nii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix;
@D.LOWTONE@@D.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT@          nii-IPFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;
@D.LOWTONE@@R.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@@R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@ nii-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-Indef;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix-Indef
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;

LEXICON nii-IPFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ii    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ii    #;


!
! 0-PFV-STAT
!
! 0-PFV-STAT and 0-IPFV-STAT share the exact same inflectional markers, and
! differ only in aspect (imperfective vs. perfective).  They are also both
! almost identical in form to 0-IPFV, differing only in some 3PL and 4SG forms
! (see comments on 0-IPFV-STAT above).  We therefore reuse those 0-IPFV TAMA
! chunk forms, relying on flag diacritics matching this TAMA class to produce
! distinctive 3PL and 4SG forms where needed.
!
LEXICON 0-PFV-STAT
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.%0-STAT@               0-IPFV-AFF ;


!
! ni-PFV
!
LEXICON ni-PFV
@U.ASPECT.PFV@@U.TAMA.ni@                    ni-PFV-AFF ;

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF
@U.VV.%0@@D.PREFIX@                          ni-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                    ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                   ni-PFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.%0@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                    ni-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.S@@D.PREFIX@                           nis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    nis-PFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.S@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     nis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

@U.VV.I@@D.PREFIX@                           nii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.INNER@                     nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@                    nii-PFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix ;
@U.VV.I@@R.PREFIX.OUTER@                     nii-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix ;

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ní    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pnis  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE (M/L -> L)
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@^Pnaà  #; ! FLOATING L-TNE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@^Pniì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@^Pniì  #; ! FLOATING L-NE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@^Pnas2 #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@^Pní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pní   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
! Throughout the ni-PFV paradigm, middle-prefix forms containing a direct
! object prefix appear with floating L tone (e.g., násigìnístín "they both
! took me home", not *násiginístín).
!
! By contrast, middle-prefix forms without a direct object prefix (e.g.,
! with gi– 3PL.SBJ and ts'i- 4SG.SBJ) do not appear with low tone (e.g.,
! nàts'iníʔón "someone put it down (solid object)", not nàts'ìníʔón).  We
! model this here by checking for the presence of object marking on the
! verb via the flag diacritic DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.
@R.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@                   ni-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;
@D.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT@                      ni-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix;

LEXICON ni-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ní    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ní    #;


LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;

LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pnis  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@^Pnaà  #; ! FLOATING L-TNE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@^Pniì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@^Pniì #; ! FLOATING L-NE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@^Pnas2 #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@^Pnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pnís  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE

LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-MiddlePrefix
@R.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@                   nis-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix;
@D.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT@                      nis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix;

LEXICON nis-PFV-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nís   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nís   #;


LEXICON nii-PFV-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@nii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@naà  #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@niì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@niì #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@nas2  #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@níí   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@níí   #;

LEXICON nii-PFV-AFF-InnerPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pnis  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pníí  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pníí  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGPLUME@^Pnaà  #; ! FLOATING L-TNE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.BIGCROW@^Pniì   #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.DIALECT.CROWCHIEF@^Pniì #; ! FLOATING L-NE
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@^Pnas2 #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@^Pníí  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@^Pníí  #; ! FLOATING L-TONE
